Hawaii statutes.
§803-9 Examination after arrest; rights of
arrested person. It shall be unlawful in any case of arrest for
examination:

(1) To deny to the person so
arrested the right of seeing, at reasonable intervals and for a reasonable time
at the place of the person's detention, counsel or a member of the arrested
person's family;

(2) To unreasonably refuse or
fail to make a reasonable effort, where the arrested person so requests and
prepays the cost of the message, to send a telephone, cable, or wireless
message through a police officer or another than the arrested person to the
counsel or member of the arrested person's family;

(3) To deny to counsel, whether
retained by the arrested person or a member of the arrested person's family, or
to a member of the arrested person's family, the right to see or otherwise
communicate with the arrested person for a reasonable period at the place of
the arrested person's detention:

(A) At any time for a first communication
after the arrest; and

(B) At reasonable intervals thereafter;

(4) In case the person arrested
has requested that the person see an attorney or member of the person's family,
to examine the person before the person has had a fair opportunity to see and
consult with the attorney or member of the person's family;

(5) To fail, within forty-eight
hours of the arrest of a person on suspicion of having committed a crime,
either to release or to charge the arrested person with a crime and take the
arrested person before a qualified magistrate for examination. [PC 1869, c 49,
§9; am L 1915, c 25, §1; RL 1925, §3975; am L 1927, c 261, §1; RL 1935, §5408;
am L 1941, c 168, §1; RL 1945, §10709; am L 1953, c 185, §1; RL 1955, §255-9;
HRS §708-9; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 2015, c 35, §31]

Cross References

See Const. art. I, §7.

Detention for examination, see §803-5.

Rules of Court

Proceedings following arrest, see HRPP rule 5.

Law Journals and Reviews

Suppression of Evidence Without the Aid of the Fourth, Fifth,
and Sixth Amendments. 8 HBJ, no. 4, at 109 (1972).

Case Notes

Forty-eight hour law. Noncompliance, in itself, has no
effect on voluntariness of confession. 37 H. 189 (1945), aff'd 163 F.2d 490
(1947); 43 H. 347 (1959); 45 H. 622, 372 P.2d 365 (1962).

McNabb-Mallory rule does not apply. 209 F.2d 75 (1953),
aff'g 39 H. 167 (1951); 47 H. 158, 385 P.2d 830 (1963); 48 H. 204, 397 P.2d 558
(1964).

Where defendant is legally arrested after indictment by grand
jury, it is immaterial whether a prior arrest was in violation of paragraph
(5). 45 H. 221, 365 P.2d 202 (1961).

Applicability of Escobedo v. Illinois, 378 U.S. 478 (1964),
and Miranda v. Arizona, 384 U.S. 436 (1966): See 49 H. 504, 506 note 3, 421
P.2d 305 (1966); 49 H. 522, 423 P.2d 438 (1967); 50 H. 42, 46, 430 P.2d 330
(1967).

Give Miranda warnings before custodial interrogation. 56 H.
366, 537 P.2d 8 (1975).

Police failed to make a reasonable effort to contact an
attorney pursuant to paragraph (2) as requested by defendant when they did
nothing more than call attorney's listed number on two different occasions,
although informed that the number was not in service; however, under
circumstances of case, this violation of this section did not warrant
suppression of defendant's subsequent statements. 96 H. 224, 30 P.3d 238
(2001).

Where, in response to alternatives presented by detectives,
petitioner's reply that petitioner wanted an attorney was sufficiently precise
to put detectives on notice of their obligations under paragraph (2),
detectives making no effort to follow up on petitioner's request to talk to an
attorney, and examination of petitioner before petitioner had fair opportunity
to see and consult with one, violated this section. 101 H. 209, 65 P.3d 156
(2003).

The request of an arrested person to "see an attorney"
under paragraph (4) requires any examination of the arrested person to
immediately cease; trial court wrongly concluded that defendant's right under
paragraph (4) to have "a fair opportunity" to consult with an
attorney was violated where police failed to refer defendant to the public
defender's office once defendant stated defendant wanted to see an attorney.
101 H. 344 (App.), 68 P.3d 618 (2002).

Under paragraph (2), there is no duty on the part of police
to make a telephone call to an attorney for the arrested person unless and
until the arrested person requests the call to be made; the trial court erred
in concluding that the police were duty-bound under paragraph (2) to contact
the public defender's office on defendant's behalf even though defendant had
made no such request. 101 H. 344 (App.), 68 P.3d 618 (2002).

Mentioned: 61 H. 291, 602 P.2d 933 (1979).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next